Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202644-319.06
Foreign companies; securities; amount required.

No foreign insurer or assessment association now or hereafter authorized to do business in this state shall henceforth transact such business unless it shall deposit and continually maintain with the Department of Insurance or with the proper official of some one state of the United States designated by law to accept such deposit, eligible securities in the amount of not less than one hundred thousand dollars for the benefit of all of its policyholders or policyholders and creditors in the United States.

Laws 1955, c. 174, § 6, p. 499;

Laws 2023, LB92, § 53.